test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-kiarun_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - kiärun: # 2B
    kiärun+N+Sg+Nom: kiärun 
    kiärun+N+Sg+Gen: kiärrun
    kiärun+N+Sg+Acc: kiärrun
    kiärun+N+Sg+Ill: kiäˊṛunân
    kiärun+N+Sg+Loc: kiäˊṛunist
    kiärun+N+Sg+Com: kiäˊṛunáin
    kiärun+N+Sg+Abe: kiärrunttáá
    kiärun+N+Ess: kiäˊṛunin
    kiärun+N+Par: kiäˊṛunid
    kiärun+N+Pl+Nom: kiäˊṛuneh
    kiärun+N+Pl+Gen: kiäˊṛunij
    kiärun+N+Pl+Acc: kiäˊṛunijd
    kiärun+N+Pl+Ill: kiäˊṛunáid
    kiärun+N+Pl+Loc: kiäˊṛunijn
    kiärun+N+Pl+Com: kiäˊṛunijguin
    kiärun+N+Pl+Abe: kiäˊṛunijttáá
